Utah statutes.
31A-7-201.   Organization, incorporation, and licensing.
Chapter 5, Part 2, Organization of Corporations, governs the organization,
incorporation, and licensing of nonprofit health service corporations with the
following exceptions:
(1)  Section 16-6a-201 applies in place of Section 31A-5-202.
(2)  Sections 16-6a-401 and 31A-1-109 apply in place of Subsection
31A-5-203(2)(a).
(3)  The last sentence of Subsection 31A-5-203(2)(e) does not apply.
